Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-564
Class I, II, or III school district; school board; officers; elect.

At the first meeting of each school board or board of education elected in a Class I, II, or III school district, and annually thereafter, the board shall elect from among its members a president and vice president. The board shall also elect a secretary who need not be a member of the board. If the secretary is a member of the board, an assistant secretary may be named and his or her duties and compensation set by the board.

Laws 1969, c. 257, § 39, p. 953;

Laws 1973, LB 557, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-516.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 317;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 41;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 48.
July 19, 2024